src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Meänkieli verbs

This file documents [`affixes/verbs.lexc`, the file for Meänkieli verb morphology](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)  

## Overview over the continuation classes

### Continuation lexica for regular verbs
* **v1** = even-syllable-stems of antaa-type; sanoa:sano
* **v1_tietaa** = tietää:ti because of changes in diftong (tiän>tiesin)
* **v1_odd** = odd-syll-stem, herättää:herättä, like v1 except PrfPrc+Sg: tapahtua>tapahtunnu 
* **v2_ata** = -ata-verbs; masinata:masina (+^A i Sg3, InfMa+Ade masinaamala)
* **v2_ata_odd** = odd-syll -ata-verbs; huomata, tryykätä:tryykkä (+^A i Sg3, InfMa+Ade huomaamalla)
* **v2_uta** = Vta-verbs; leipota:leippo (+^A^A i Sg3)
* **v2** = continuationlexicon for v2_ata, v2_ata_odd and v2_uta
* **v3** = syö'ä:syö 
* **v4** = nousta; tulla:tul
* **v4_3la** = varjela, varjelee
* **v4_4lla** = ajatella, ajattellee
* **v5** = tarvita:tarv
* **v6** = paeta:pake
* **v_vanheta** = vanheta
* **vx** = unassigned

### Continuation lexica for irregular verbs
* **v3_tehha**
* **v3_nahha**
* **v3_kaya**
* **OLLA**
* **NEG**
* **v3_jua** ! No juoJa-form, stem ju-, otherwise like v3 
* **v3_syä** ! No syöJä-form, stem sy-, otherwise like v3
## The verb lexica themselves

* **LEXICON vx**
**LEXICON vx** pointing to *v1*

# Irregular verbs

* **LEXICON OLLA**
**LEXICON OLLA** olla-paradigm

* **LEXICON NEG** negation verb

# Regular verbs

* **LEXICON v1_otta** otta-lexicon

* **LEXICON v1_tietaa** tietää-lexicon because of changes in diftong (tiän>tiesin)

* **LEXICON v1** sanoa, lukea, antaa:anta 

* **LEXICON v1_var** !Test mahtaa>mahtan & mahan !TBC - where does it occur?

* **LEXICON v1_odd** käsittää>käsittänny osv 

* **LEXICON v1_odd_var** tapahtua >tapahtun & tapahun !TBC - where does it occur?

* **LEXICON v1_taitaa** taitaa-lexicon because of t:s although no a:0 in suffix

* **LEXICON v2** huomata, haluta övriga former 

* **LEXICON v2_ata** masinata etc

* **LEXICON v2_ata_odd** huomata etc

* **LEXICON v2_Hata_odd** kohata etc

* **LEXICON v2_uta** haluta etc

* **LEXICON v2_havata** havata-paradigm 

* **LEXICON v3_syä** syä, myä, lyä .#.

* **LEXICON v3_jua** jua, lua, sua, tua .#.

* **LEXICON v3_ja** for inf with ’a; saaja

* **LEXICON v3_ta** maata

* **LEXICON v3_j** contlex for viejä mfl

* **LEXICON v3_viä**

* **LEXICON v3_other** contlex för v3-type (saaja, syöjä)

* **LEXICON v3_kaya** käyä:kä 

* **LEXICON v3_nahha** nähä:nä 

* **LEXICON v3_tehha** tehä:te 

* **LEXICON v4** tulla, mennä etc

* **LEXICON v4_julkasta** julkasta etc

* **LEXICON v4_julkas** julkasta etc

* **LEXICON v4_3la** varjela:varjel

* **LEXICON v4_4lla** lauleskella etc

* **LEXICON v5**  kehitä:kehi  

* **LEXICON v5_keritä**  keritä:kerki  

* **LEXICON v6** =  paeta:pake

## Subparadigms
### Conditional forms

**LEXICON 2cond**  for -imm^A

### Infinitive paradigms

from fkv

LEXICON v12pers Only sg12, pl12 so far

LEXICON PRFPRC_OBL is without nom sg from fkv

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
